Nebraska, session 109, LB139.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 76-2239, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
76-2239 (1)(a) (1) The board may, upon its own motion, and shall, upon the
written complaint of any aggrieved person, cause an investigation to be made
with respect to an alleged violation of the Real Property Appraiser Act. Upon
receipt of information indicating a violation of the Real Property Appraiser
Act, the board shall make an investigation of the facts to determine if there
is evidence of a violation. If technical assistance is required for
investigation, the board may contract with or use any qualified person for such
technical assistance.
(b) The board may revoke or suspend the credential or otherwise discipline
a credential holder, revoke or suspend a qualifying or continuing education
course or activity, deny any application, or issue a cease and desist order, or
enter into a contingent dismissal agreement with remedial measures with a
credential holder for any violation of the Real Property Appraiser Act.
(c) Any disciplinary action taken against a credentialed real property
appraiser, including any action that limits a credentialed real property
appraiser's ability to engage in real property appraisal practice, shall be
reported to federal authorities as required by Title XI of the Financial
Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989. A successfully
completed contingent dismissal agreement is not disciplinary action. Upon
receipt of information indicating that a person may have violated any provision
of the Real Property Appraiser Act, the board shall make an investigation of
the facts to determine whether or not there is evidence of a violation. If
technical assistance is required, the board may contract with or use qualified
persons.
(2)(a) If an investigation indicates that a person may have violated a
provision of the Real Property Appraiser Act act, the board may offer the
person an opportunity to voluntarily and informally discuss the alleged
violation before the board. The board may enter into consent agreements, or
negotiate settlements, or enter into contingent dismissal agreements.
(b) If an investigation indicates that a person not holding a credential
under the act has violated a provision of the act, the board may issue a cease
and desist order or refer the investigation to the appropriate county attorney
for the consideration of formal charges.
(c) If an investigation indicates that a credential holder has violated a
provision of the act, a formal complaint shall be prepared by the board and
served upon the credential holder. The complaint shall require the credential
holder to file an answer within thirty days of the date of service. In
responding to a complaint, the credential holder may admit the allegations of
the complaint, deny the allegations of the complaint, or plead otherwise.
Failure to make a timely response shall be deemed an admission of the
allegations of the complaint. Upon receipt of an answer to the complaint, the
director or chairperson of the board shall set a date, time, and place for an
administrative hearing on the complaint. The date of the hearing shall not be
less than thirty nor more than one hundred twenty days from the date that the
answer is filed unless such date is extended for good cause.
Sec. 2. Section 76-3207, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
76-3207 (1) An appraisal management company A person applying for issuance
of a registration or renewal of a registration shall not:
(a) In whole or in part, directly or indirectly, be owned by any person
who has had a real property appraiser credential or equivalent refused, denied,
canceled, or revoked or who has surrendered a real property appraiser
credential or equivalent in lieu of revocation in any jurisdiction for a
substantive cause as determined by the board; and
(b) Be more than ten percent owned by a person who is not of good moral
character, which for purposes of this section shall require that such person
has not been convicted of, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to, a felony
relating to the real property appraisal practice or any crime involving fraud,
misrepresentation, or moral turpitude or failed to submit to a criminal history
record check through the Nebraska State Patrol and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation.
(2) For purposes of subdivision (1)(b) of this section, each individual
-1-

LB139 LB139
2025 2025
owner of more than ten percent of an appraisal management company shall:
(a) At the time an application for issuance of a registration is made,
submit two copies of legible ink-rolled fingerprint cards or equivalent
electronic fingerprint submissions to the board for delivery to the Nebraska
State Patrol in a form approved by both the Nebraska State Patrol and the
Federal Bureau of Investigation;
(b) At the time an application for renewal of a registration is made,
submit two copies of legible ink-rolled fingerprint cards or equivalent
electronic fingerprint submissions to the board for delivery to the Nebraska
State Patrol in a form approved by both the Nebraska State Patrol and the
Federal Bureau of Investigation if a fingerprint-based national criminal
history records check has not been completed pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of
this section; and
(c) At the time an individual owner of more than ten percent of an
appraisal management company is identified by the board, submit two copies of
legible ink-rolled fingerprint cards or equivalent electronic fingerprint
submissions to the board for delivery to the Nebraska State Patrol in a form
approved by both the Nebraska State Patrol and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation if a fingerprint-based national criminal history records check
has not been completed pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) or (2)(b) of this
section.
(3) The board shall pay the Nebraska State Patrol the costs associated
with conducting a fingerprint-based national criminal history record check
through the Nebraska State Patrol and the Federal Bureau of Investigation with
such record check to be carried out by the board.
(4) For the purpose of subdivision (1)(a) of this section, a person is not
barred from issuance of a registration if the real property appraiser
credential or equivalent of the person with an ownership interest was not
refused, denied, canceled, revoked, or surrendered in lieu of revocation for a
substantive cause as determined by the board and has been reinstated by the
jurisdiction in which the action was taken.
Sec. 3. Section 76-3216, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
76-3216 (1) It is unlawful for a person to directly or indirectly engage
in or attempt to engage in business as an appraisal management company or to
advertise or hold itself out as engaging in or conducting business as an
appraisal management company in this state without first obtaining a
registration or by meeting the requirements as a federally regulated appraisal
management company.
(2) Except as provided in section 76-3204, any person who, directly or
indirectly for another, offers, attempts, or agrees to perform all actions
described in subdivision (6) of section 76-3202 or any action described in
subdivision (7) of such section, shall be deemed an appraisal management
company within the meaning of the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company
Registration Act, and such action shall constitute sufficient contact with this
state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over such person in any action
arising out of the act.
(3) The board may issue a cease and desist order against any person who
violates this section by performing any action described in subdivision (6) or
(7) of section 76-3202 without the appropriate registration. Such order shall
be final ten days after issuance unless such person requests a hearing pursuant
to section 76-3217. The board may, through the Attorney General, obtain an
order from the district court for the enforcement of the cease and desist
order.
(4) To the extent permitted by any applicable federal legislation or
regulation, the board may censure an appraisal management company,
conditionally or unconditionally suspend or revoke its registration, or levy
fines or impose civil penalties not to exceed five thousand dollars for a first
offense and not to exceed ten thousand dollars for a second or subsequent
offense, or enter into a contingent dismissal agreement with remedial measures
with an appraisal management company, if the board determines that an appraisal
management company is attempting to perform, has performed, or has attempted to
perform any of the following:
(a) A material violation of the act;
(b) A violation of any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the
board; or
(c) Procurement of a registration for itself or any other person by fraud,
misrepresentation, or deceit.
(5) In order to promote voluntary compliance, encourage appraisal
management companies to correct errors promptly, and ensure a fair and
consistent approach to enforcement, the board shall endeavor to impose fines or
civil penalties that are reasonable in light of the nature, extent, and
severity of the violation. The board shall also take action against an
appraisal management company's registration only after less severe sanctions
have proven insufficient to ensure behavior consistent with the Nebraska
Appraisal Management Company Registration Act. When deciding whether to impose
a sanction permitted by subsection (4) of this section, determining the
sanction that is most appropriate in a specific instance, or making any other
discretionary decision regarding the enforcement of the act, the board shall
consider whether an appraisal management company:
(a) Has an effective program reasonably designed to ensure compliance with
the act;
(b) Has taken prompt and appropriate steps to correct and prevent the
-2-

LB139 LB139
2025 2025
recurrence of any detected violations; and
(c) Has independently reported to the board any significant violations or
potential violations of the act prior to an imminent threat of disclosure or
investigation and within a reasonably prompt time after becoming aware of the
occurrence of such violations.
(6) Any violation of appraisal-related laws or rules and regulations, and
disciplinary action taken against an appraisal management company, shall be
reported to the Appraisal Subcommittee as required by Title XI of the Financial
Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, the AMC rule, and
any policy or rule established by the Appraisal Subcommittee. A successfully
completed contingent dismissal agreement is not disciplinary action.
Sec. 4. Original sections 76-2239, 76-3207, and 76-3216, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-3-